Hawaii statutes.
§286-222 General powers. (a) The
department of transportation may regulate the transportation of hazardous
materials by motor carrier in commerce.

(b) The department shall annually adopt the
hazardous material regulations established by the United States Department of
Transportation and published in Title 49, Code of Federal Regulations, Parts
107, 171 to 173, inclusive, and Parts 177, 178, and 180. All other rules
adopted by the State and political subdivisions thereof shall be consistent
therewith.

(c) Any hazardous material which meets the
federal and state criteria of a hazardous material must be handled and
transported according to the appropriate requirements of the federal hazardous
materials regulations and the additional requirements in this part. [L 1989, c
185, pt of §2; am L 1996, c 134, §3; am L 2000, c 86, §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next